Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4136.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 43540g. (1) The secretary of state shall provide voter registration applications to the department and those persons designated by the department to issue a resident hunting, fur harvester's, or fishing license. (2) The department or a person designated by the department to issue a resident hunting, fur harvester's, or fishing license shall display and make available voter registration applications to the public and may ask each individual who applies for a resident hunting, fur harvester's, or fishing license whether the individual would like a voter registration application. The department or a person designated by the department to issue a resident hunting, fur harvester's, or fishing license shall not assist an individual in completing a voter registration application. (3) The department shall provide a link to the department of state's voter registration application website page for each applicant who applies on the department's website for a resident hunting, fur harvester's, or fishing license. (4) The department or a person designated by the department to issue a resident hunting, fur harvester's, or fishing license is not a designated voter registration agency as that term is defined in section 509m of the Michigan election law, 1954 PA 116, MCL 168.509m, and shall not perform voter registration activities, including, but not limited to, accepting or collecting complete or incomplete voter registration applications.